Massachusetts, session 194th, H169.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Whereas the overall supply of cannabis determines the market’s price per ounce and price
per ounce determines the profitability and sustainability of current market participants,
Hereby, we require the Cannabis Control Commission to analyze whether its permitting
of marijuana cultivator or marijuana product manufacturer licenses is over-supplying the market
and putting existing market players at risk of failure.
SECTION 1. (a) The Cannabis Control Commission shall conduct or retain an outside
expert in economic analysis to conduct and publish a study on supply and demand in the
cannabis market, including the legally licensed businesses and the existing black market. The
of 2

study shall review the current cannabis canopy supply for patients and consumers; project future
trends in consumption; provide an in-depth look at the price per pound as a market driver for
consumers; and analyze the adequacy of the commission’s regulations on cultivation tiers. The
study will offer projections for the appropriate number of licenses to enter the market per year
given demand projections.
of 2